Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 2. Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act
§ 35-5-222.
Facilitation of anatomical gift from decedent whose body is under jurisdiction of coroner.

Upon request of a procurement organization, a coroner shall release to the procurement organization the name, contact information and available medical and social history of a decedent whose body is under the jurisdiction of the coroner. If the decedent’s body or part is medically suitable for transplantation, therapy, research or education, the coroner shall release post-mortem examination results to the procurement organization. The procurement organization may make a subsequent disclosure of the post-mortem examination results or other information received from the coroner only if relevant to transplantation or therapy.

The coroner may conduct a medicolegal examination by reviewing all medical records, laboratory test results, x-rays, other diagnostic results and other information that any person possesses about a donor or prospective donor whose body is under the jurisdiction of the coroner which the coroner determines may be relevant to the investigation.

A person who has any information requested by a coroner pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall provide that information as expeditiously as possible to allow the coroner to conduct the medicolegal investigation within a period compatible with the preservation of parts for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research or education.

If an anatomical gift has been or might be made of a part of a decedent whose body is under the jurisdiction of the coroner and a post-mortem examination is not required, or the coroner determines that a post-mortem examination is required but that the recovery of the part that is the subject of an anatomical gift will not interfere with the examination, the coroner and procurement organization shall cooperate in the timely removal of the part from the decedent for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research or education.

If an anatomical gift of a part from the decedent under the jurisdiction of the coroner has been or might be made, but the coroner initially believes that the recovery of the part could interfere with the post-mortem investigation into the decedent’s cause or manner of death, the coroner shall consult with the procurement organization or physician or technician designated by the procurement organization about the proposed recovery. After consultation, the coroner may deny the recovery.

The coroner and procurement organization shall enter into an agreement establishing protocols and procedures governing relations between them when the coroner believes that the recovery of a part for anatomical gift from a decedent whose body is under the jurisdiction of the coroner could interfere with the post-mortem investigation into the decedent’s cause or manner of death or the documentation or preservation of evidence. Decisions regarding the recovery of a part from the decedent shall be made in accordance with the agreement.

If the coroner or designee denies recovery under subsection (f) of this section, the coroner or designee shall:

Explain in a record the specific reasons for not allowing recovery of the part;

Include the specific reasons in the records of the coroner; and

Provide a record with the specific reasons to the procurement organization.

If the coroner or designee allows recovery of a part under subsection (d), (e) or (f) of this section, the procurement organization, upon request, shall cause the physician or technician who removes the part to provide the coroner with a record describing the condition of the part, a biopsy, a photograph and any other information and observations that would assist in the post-mortem examination.

If a coroner or designee is required to be present at a removal procedure under subsection (f) of this section, upon request the procurement organization requesting the recovery of the part shall reimburse the coroner or designee for the additional costs incurred in complying with subsection (f) of this section.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 97, § 1.

§ 35-5-223.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 97, § 1.

§ 35-5-224.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This act modifies, limits and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit or supersede Section 101(a) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001, or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7003(b).

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 97, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-5-202(a)(xxxi)

§ 35-5-225.
Promotion of anatomical gifts.

Any money received from donations by owners of vehicles under W.S. 31-3-101(h) shall be deposited into a separate anatomical awareness account to be used by the department of health and its advisory council to promote general public awareness and education for the procurement of organ and tissue donations for anatomical gifts pursuant to this act.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 97, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 97, § 4, provides: “Commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2009, any funds in the account established by W.S. 35-5-118 shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the account established by W.S.

35-5-225

.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-5-202(a)(xxxi)